New York, session 2025-2026, S5551.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 6 of section 1 of 2 chapter 174 of the laws of 1968 constituting the New York state urban 3 development corporation act is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) to any other person, firm, partnership or corporation, without 5 public bidding or public sale, provided there is published in at least 6 one newspaper of general circulation in the municipality in which the 7 project is located a notice which shall include a statement of the iden- 8 tity of the proposed purchaser or lessee and of [his] their proposed use 9 or reuse of the land use improvement project area or applicable portion 10 thereof, the price or rental to be paid by such purchaser or lessee, all 11 other essential conditions of such sale or lease, and a statement that a 12 public hearing upon such sale or lease will be held before the corpo- 13 ration at a specified time and place on a date not less than ten days 14 after such publication, and provided further that such public hearing is 15 held in accordance with such notice. Such public hearing shall be 16 recorded and such recording shall be posted on the public website of the 17 corporation within forty-eight hours of such hearing. 18 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 8 of section 1 of chapter 174 of the 19 laws of 1968 constituting the New York state urban development corpo- 20 ration act is amended to read as follows: 21 (2) Before any sale or lease of all or a substantial part of a project 22 as authorized by subdivision one of this section is consummated, there 23 shall be published in at least one newspaper of general circulation in 24 the municipality in which the project is located a notice which shall EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10203-01-5 S. 5551 2 1 include a statement of the identity of the proposed purchaser or lessee, 2 the price or rental to be paid, all other essential conditions of such 3 sale or lease, and a statement that a public hearing upon such sale or 4 lease will be held before the corporation at a specified time and place 5 on a date not less than ten days after such publication, [and] such 6 hearing shall be held in accordance with such notice and such hearing 7 shall be recorded and such recording shall be posted on the public 8 website of the corporation within forty-eight hours of such hearing; 9 provided, however, that if the corporation determines that trade secrets 10 or other confidential information about the prospective purchaser's or 11 lessee's business operations, products, processes or designs would 12 otherwise be revealed by such public notice and public hearing, the 13 requirements of this subdivision may be waived by unanimous vote of the 14 directors of the corporation. 15 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 14 of section 1 of chapter 174 of the 16 laws of 1968 constituting the New York state urban development corpo- 17 ration act, as amended by chapter 576 of the laws of 1969, is amended to 18 read as follows: 19 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special or local 20 law or charter, any municipality, by resolution of its local governing 21 body, is hereby empowered without referendum, public auction, sealed 22 bids or public notice, to sell, lease for a term not exceeding ninety- 23 nine years, grant or convey to the corporation any real property owned 24 by it which the corporation shall certify to be necessary or convenient 25 for its corporate purposes. Any such sale, lease, grant or conveyance 26 shall be made with or without consideration and upon such terms and 27 conditions as may be agreed upon by such municipality and the corpo- 28 ration. Certification shall be evidenced by a formal request from the 29 president of the corporation. Before any such sale, lease, grant or 30 conveyance may be made to the corporation, a public hearing shall be 31 held by the local governing body to consider the same. Notice of such 32 hearing shall be published at least ten days before the date set for the 33 hearing in such publication and in such manner as may be designated by 34 the local governing body. Such public hearing shall be recorded and such 35 recording shall be posted on the public website of the corporation with- 36 in forty-eight hours of such hearing. 37 § 4. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 38 16 of section 1 of chapter 174 of the laws of 1968 constituting the New 39 York state urban development corporation act, as amended by chapter 732 40 of the laws of 1990, is amended to read as follows: 41 (iii) in any city having a population of one million or more, provide 42 to any community board in which the project will be located, a notice 43 that such plan will be filed upon its adoption by the corporation and 44 that digests thereof will be available, which notice shall also state 45 that a public hearing will be held to consider the plan at a specified 46 time and place on a date not less than ten days after such publication, 47 such public hearing shall be recorded and such recording shall be posted 48 on the public website of the corporation within forty-eight hours of 49 such hearing; 50 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.